Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Juvenile Institutions.

Administrative Code. —

For juvenile correctional facilities and juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52.

Sec. 47.14.010.
General powers of department over juvenile facilities and institutions.

The department may

purchase, lease, or construct buildings or other facilities for the care, detention, rehabilitation, and education of children in need of aid or delinquent minors;

adopt plans for construction of juvenile detention facilities, juvenile treatment facilities, and other juvenile institutions;

adopt standards and regulations for the design, construction, repair, maintenance, and operation of all juvenile detention facilities, juvenile treatment facilities, and institutions;

inspect periodically each juvenile detention facility, juvenile treatment facility, or other institution to ensure that the standards and regulations adopted are being maintained;

reimburse municipalities maintaining and operating juvenile detention facilities;

enter into contracts and arrangements with cities and state and federal agencies to carry out the purposes of AS 47.10, AS 47.12, and this chapter;

do all acts necessary to carry out the purposes of AS 47.10, AS 47.12, and this chapter;

adopt the regulations necessary to carry out AS 47.10, AS 47.12, and this chapter;

accept donations, gifts, or bequests of money or other property for use in construction of juvenile institutions, detention facilities, or juvenile treatment facilities;

operate juvenile detention facilities when municipalities are unable to do so;

receive, care for, and place in a juvenile detention facility, the minor’s own home, a foster home, a juvenile treatment facility, or treatment institution all minors committed to its custody under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, and this chapter.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 47 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 7 AAC 52, art. 1.

For admission to juvenile correctional facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 2.

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For program and treatment, see 7 AAC 52, art. 4.

For communications and visiting, see 7 AAC 52, art. 5.

For discipline, see 7 AAC 52, art. 6.

For supervision, see 7 AAC 52, art. 7.

For juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 8.

For child foster care payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 1.

For children in custody or under supervision: needs and income, see 7 AAC 53, art. 3.

For residential child care facility grants, see 7 AAC 53, art. 5.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

For grievance procedure, see 7 AAC 54, art. 2.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (2), substituted “juvenile detention facilities, juvenile treatment facilities” for “juvenile homes, juvenile work camps, juvenile detention facilities”; in (3), substituted “facilities, juvenile treatment facilities” for “home, work camp, facilities”; in (4), substituted “facility, juvenile treatment facility” for “home, work camp facility”; in (5), substituted “municipalities” for “cities” and deleted “homes, work camps, and” following “juvenile detention”; in (9), deleted “homes, work camps,” following “construction of juvenile”, added “, or juvenile treatment facilities” at the end, and made a related change; in (10), substituted “juvenile detention facilities” for “juvenile homes”; in (11), substituted “juvenile detention facility” for “juvenile detention home”, substituted “juvenile treatment facility” for “correctional school, work camp” and made a related change.

Collateral references. —

60 Am Jur. 2d, Penal and Correctional Institutions, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 47.14.020.
Duties of department.

The department shall

accept all minors committed to the custody of the department and all minors who are involved in a written agreement under AS

47.14.100(c)

, and provide for the welfare, control, care, custody, and placement of these minors in accordance with this chapter;

require and collect statistics on juvenile offenses and offenders in the state;

conduct studies and prepare findings and recommendations on the need, number, type, construction, maintenance, and operating costs of juvenile detention facilities, juvenile treatment facilities, and other institutions, and adopt and submit a plan for construction of the facilities and institutions when needed, together with a plan for financing the construction programs;

examine, where possible, all facilities, institutions, and places of juvenile detention and treatment in the state and inquire into their methods and the management of juveniles in them.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 48 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 7 AAC 52, art. 1.

For admission to juvenile correctional facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 2.

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For program and treatment, see 7 AAC 52, art. 4.

For communications and visiting, see 7 AAC 52, art. 5.

For discipline, see 7 AAC 52, art. 6.

For supervision, see 7 AAC 52, art. 7.

For juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (3), substituted “juvenile detention facilities, juvenile treatment facilities” for “homes, work camps, facilities” following “operating costs of”, deleted “homes, work camps,” following “construction of the” and made related and stylistic changes; in (4), deleted “work camps,” following “institutions,”, inserted “and treatment” following “juvenile detention”.

Sec. 47.14.025.
Applicability; inclusions of certain persons as minors.

The provisions of AS

47.14.010

—

47.14.050

apply to a person who is 18 years of age or older and who is subject to the jurisdiction of AS 47.12 due solely to AS

47.12.020(b)

. To implement this section, the term “minor” as used in AS

47.14.010

—

47.14.050

includes a person described in this section.

History.

(§ 8 ch 70 SLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that the enactment of AS

47.14.025

has the effect of amending specific Alaska Delinquency Rules to conform those court rules to the statutory change to acknowledge the inclusion of certain persons 18 years of age or older as minors under this chapter and to acknowledge the special statutory provisions contained in this section to those persons.
For a list of the specific court rules affected, see § 10, ch. 70, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.
Section 11(a), ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that this section “[applies] to offenses committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Sec. 47.14.030.
Use of standardized form by facilities.

For the purpose of collecting statistics, the department shall establish and require state and local agencies that operate a jail or other detention facility to use a standardized form to keep a record and report the admission of a minor. The record shall be limited to the name of the minor admitted, the minor’s date of birth, the specific offense for which the minor was admitted, the date and time admitted, the date and time released, the sex of the minor, the ethnic origin of the minor, and other information required by federal law. Except for the notation of the date and time of the minor’s release, the record shall be prepared at the time of the minor’s admission. Unless otherwise provided by law, information and records obtained under this section are confidential and are not public records. They may be disclosed only for the purpose of compiling statistics and in a manner that does not reveal the identity of the minor.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.14.040.
Authority to maintain and operate temporary secure juvenile holding area, juvenile detention facility, or juvenile treatment facility.

A municipality or entity may maintain and operate a temporary secure juvenile holding area, and a municipality or a nonprofit corporation may maintain and operate a juvenile detention facility or juvenile treatment facility.

The municipality or nonprofit corporation may receive grants-in-aid from the state for costs of operation of the temporary secure juvenile holding area or facility maintained and operated under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 49 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a), substituted “municipality or entity” for “city” near the beginning, substituted “temporary secure juvenile holding area” for “juvenile detention facility” following “operate a”, substituted “municipality” for “city” preceding “or a nonprofit corporation”, substituted “facility or juvenile treatment facility” for “home or a juvenile work camp” at the end; in (b), substituted “municipality” for “city” near the beginning, substituted “temporary secure juvenile holding area or facility” for “homes, work camps, or facilities” following “operation of the”.

Sec. 47.14.050.
Operation of homes and facilities.

The department shall adopt standards and regulations for the operation of juvenile detention facilities and juvenile treatment facilities in the state.

The department may enter into contracts with municipalities and other governmental agencies for the detention of juveniles before and after commitment by juvenile authorities. A contract may not be made for longer than one year.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 50, 51 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 7 AAC 52, art. 1.

For admission to juvenile correctional facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 2.

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For program and treatment, see 7 AAC 52, art. 4.

For communications and visiting, see 7 AAC 52, art. 5.

For discipline, see 7 AAC 52, art. 6.

For supervision, see 7 AAC 52, art. 7.

For juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, rewrote (a); in (b), substituted “municipalities” for “cities” following “into contracts with” in the first sentence.